bg-BG: Материал на покритието на телта за мъниста: С найлоново покритие; С пластмасово покритие; С полимерно покритие (неуточнено); Без покритие; С винилово покритие; Друго
lt-LT: Vielos, skirtos karoliukų vėrimui, danga: Dengta nailonu; Dengta plastiku; Dengta polimeru (nenurodyta); Nedengta; Dengta vinilu; Kita
pt-PT: Material de revestimento de arame para missangas: Com revestimento em nylon; Com revestimento em plástico; Com revestimento em polímero (não especificado); Sem revestimento; Com revestimento em vinil; Outro
sk-SK: Povrchový materiál drôtu na na navliekanie korálok: Potiahnuté nylónom; Potiahnuté plastom; Potiahnuté polymérom (nešpecifikované); Nepotiahnuté; Potiahnuté vinylom; Iné
hu: Gyöngyfűző drót bevonóanyaga: Nejlonbevonatú; Műanyag bevonatú; Polimer bevonatú (nincs megadva); Bevonat nélküli; Vinilbevonatú; Egyéb
pl: Materiał powłoki drutu do koralików: Powlekany nylonem; Powlekany plastikiem; Powlekany polimerem (nieokreślony); Niepowlekany; Powlekany winylem; Inne
cs: Materiál na potahování drátu pro korálkování: Potaženo nylonem; Potaženo plastem; Potaženo polymerem (nespecifikováno); Bez potahu; Potaženo vinylem; Jiné
th: วัสดุเคลือบเส้นลวดร้อยลูกปัด: เคลือบไนลอน; เคลือบพลาสติก; เคลือบโพลีเมอร์ (ไม่ระบุ); ไม่เคลือบ; เคลือบไวนิล; อื่นๆ
da: Belægningsmateriale på perlewire: Nylonbelagt; Plastikbelagt; Polymerbelagt (uspecificeret); Uden belægning; Vinylbelagt; Andet
ja: ビーズワイヤーコーティング素材: ナイロンコーティング; プラスチックコーティング; ポリマーコーティング (指定なし); コーティングなし; ビニールコーティング; その他
tr: Boncuk teli kaplama malzemesi: Naylon kaplı; Plastik kaplı; Polimer kaplı (belirtilmemiş); Kaplamasız; Vinil kaplı; Diğer
es: Material de recubrimiento de alambre para tejido con cuentas: Recubierto de nailon; Recubierto de plástico; Recubierto de polímero (no especificado); Sin recubrimiento; Recubierto de vinilo; Otro
nl: Rijgdraad coatingmateriaal: Nylongecoat; Plastic gecoat; Polymeergecoat (ongespecificeerd); Ongecoat; Vinylgecoat; Overige
en: Beading wire coating material: Nylon-coated; Plastic-coated; Polymer-coated (unspecified); Uncoated; Vinyl-coated; Other
ko: 비즈 공예용 와이어 코팅 재질: 나일론 코팅; 플라스틱 코팅; 폴리머 코팅(미지정); 코팅 없음; 비닐 코팅; 기타
hr-HR: Materijal za premazivanje žice za perle: Obloženo najlonom; Obloženo plastikom; Obloženo polimerom (nije navedeno); Bez obloge; Obloženo vinilom; Ostalo
fi: Helmilangan pinnoitemateriaali: Nailonpäällysteinen; Muovipäällysteinen; Polymeeripäällysteinen (määrittelemätön); Päällystämätön; Vinyylipäällysteinen; Muu
sl-SI: Material za prevleko žice za perlice: Prevlečeno z najlonom; Prevlečeno s plastiko; Prevlečeno s polimerom (nedoločeno); Brez prevleke; Prevlečeno z vinilom; Drugo
ro-RO: Material de acoperire pentru firul de broderie: Înveliș din nailon; Înveliș din plastic; Înveliș din polimer (nespecificat); Fără înveliș; Înveliș din vinil; Altele
ru: Материал покрытия проволоки для бисероплетения: Нейлоновое покрытие; Пластиковое покрытие; Полимерное покрытие (без уточнения); Без покрытия; Виниловое покрытие; Другое
pt-BR: Material de revestimento de arame para bijuteria: Revestimento de nylon; Revestimento de plástico; Revestimento de polímero (não especificado); Sem revestimento; Revestimento de vinil; Outros
nb: Beleggmateriale for perletråd: Nylonbelagt; Plastbelagt; Polymerbelagt (uspesifisert); Ubelagt; Vinylbelagt; Annet
fr: Matériau du revêtement du fil de perlage: Revêtu de nylon; Revêtu de plastique; Revêtu de polymère (non spécifié); Non revêtu; Revêtu de vinyle; Autre
it: Materiale di rivestimento per filo perline: Rivestimento in nylon; Rivestimento in plastica; Rivestimento in polimeri (non specificato); Non rivestito; Rivestimento in vinile; Altro
de: Beschichtungsmaterial für Drahtperlen: Nylonbeschichtet; Kunststoffbeschichtet; Polymerbeschichtet (unspezifiziert); Unbeschichtet; Vinylbeschichtet; Sonstige
el: Υλικό επικάλυψης σύρματος με χάντρες: Με επικάλυψη νάιλον; Με επικάλυψη πλαστικού; Με επικάλυψη πολυμερούς (μη καθορισμένο); Χωρίς επικάλυψη; Με επικάλυψη βινυλίου; Άλλο
vi: Chất liệu lớp phủ dây xâu hạt: Bọc nylon; Bọc nhựa; Bọc polyme (không xác định); Không bọc; Bọc vinyl; Khác
sv: Beläggningsmaterial för pärltråd: Nylonbelagd; Plastbelagd; Polymerbelagd (ospecificerad); Obelagd; Vinylbelagd; Övrigt
zh-TW: 串珠線塗層材質: 尼龍塗層; 塑膠塗層; 聚合物塗層 (未指定); 無塗層; 乙烯基塗層; 其他
zh-CN: 串珠线涂层材料: 尼龙涂层; 塑料涂层; 聚合物涂层（未指定）; 无涂层; 乙烯基涂层; 其他